Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1048
School of electrolysis, defined.

School of electrolysis means a school for the education and training of electrologists.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 22;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-365.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 310.